Utah statutes.
58-46a-302.   Qualifications for licensure.

(1)  Each applicant for licensure as a hearing instrument specialist shall:

(a)  submit to the division an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee as determined by the division pursuant to Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  be of good moral character;

(d) (i)  have successfully completed 4,000 hours of practice as a hearing instrument intern within the state under supervision by a supervising hearing instrument specialist in accordance with Section 58-46a-302.5 or an equivalent as approved by the division; or

(ii)  demonstrate successful practice for the equivalent of two years of full-time practice as a licensed hearing instrument specialist in another state requiring licensure and practice in conformity with defined lawful and professional standards of practice;

(e)  have qualified for and currently hold board certification by the National Board for Certification - Hearing Instrument Sciences, or an equivalent certification approved by the division in collaboration with the board;

(f)  have passed the Utah Law and Rules Examination for Hearing Instrument Specialists; and

(g)  if the applicant holds a hearing instrument intern license, surrender the hearing instrument intern license at the time of licensure as a hearing instrument specialist.

(2)  Each applicant for licensure as a hearing instrument intern shall:

(a)  submit to the division an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee as determined by the division pursuant to Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  be of good moral character;

(d)  have passed the Utah Law and Rules Examination for Hearing Instrument Specialists; and

(e)  present evidence acceptable to the division and the board that the applicant, when licensed, will practice as a hearing instrument intern only under supervision of a supervising hearing instrument specialist as required under Subsection (1)(d).



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

